Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1073XS (3) 91 as/js S.F. 126 Section 1. Section 902.1, subsection 2, paragraph a, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 Notwithstanding subsection 1 , a defendant convicted of 4 murder in the first degree in violation of section 707.2 , 5 and who was under the age of eighteen twenty at the time 6 the offense was committed shall receive one of the following 7 sentences: 8 Sec. 2. Section 902.1, subsection 3, paragraph a, 9 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 Notwithstanding subsections 1 and 2 , a defendant convicted 12 of a class âAâ felony, other than murder in the first degree 13 in violation of section 707.2 , and who was under the age of 14 eighteen twenty at the time the offense was committed shall 15 receive one of the following sentences: 16